Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 273.058 is amended to read:
273.058. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 758.010, the  Department of State Lands may establish and
impose a one-time application fee in the amount of $750  on a person applying for an easement to
construct a water, gas, electric or communication service line, fixture or other facility on  state land
other than state land located within the territorial sea. [in the following amounts: ]
[(a) On state land other than that described in paragraph (b) of this subsection, $750. ]
[(b) On state land located within the territorial sea, $5,000. ]
(2) The department may not impose an application fee established under subsection (1)  of this
section more than once per application for an  easement to construct a water, gas, electric or com-
munication service line, fixture or other facility.
(3) For purposes of subsection (1) of this section, an application  for an easement to construct
a water, gas, electric or communication service line must include  all crossings of state land within
a county. However, if the applicant applies for an easement to construct a water,  gas, electric or
communication service line for a single crossing of  contiguous state land involving two counties, the
applicant may submit one application and the department may charge  the applicant only one appli-
cation  fee.
(4) Notwithstanding ORS 758.010, the  Director of the Department of State Lands, in ac-
cordance with ORS chapter 183, shall establish by  rule application fees, application renewal
fees and compensation rates for easements to construct, maintain and decommission water,
gas, electric, communication or  telecommunication service lines, fixtures or other facilities
on state land located within the territorial sea.
(5) Application fees and application renewal fees adopted under subsection  (4) of this
section shall be  reasonably calculated to offset the costs to the Department of State Lands
of granting and renewing easements described in subsection (4) of this section.
SECTION 2.
The Director of the Department of State Lands shall adopt rules establishing
fees and compensation rates described in ORS 273.058 (4) no later than January 1, 2027.
SECTION 3. No later than February 15, 2026,  the Department of State Lands shall submit
a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245 to  the committees of the Legislative As-
sembly related to the environment, land use and natural resources  that describes the
Enrolled Senate Bill 793 (SB 793-A) Page 1
department’s progress in  implementing the amendments to ORS 273.058 by section 1 of this
2025 Act.
SECTION 4. (1) Notwithstanding the amendments to ORS 273.058 by section 1  of this 2025
Act, the Department  of State Lands shall continue to impose a one-time application fee of
$5,000 for easements to construct a facility described in ORS 273.058 (4) on state land located
within the  territorial sea until the date on which rules establishing application fees under
ORS 273.058, as amended by section 1 of this 2025 Act, first become effective.
(2) As used in this section,  “state land” has the meaning given that term in ORS 273.006.
SECTION 5.
Section 4 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 6. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate June 17, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 19, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 793 (SB 793-A) Page 2